Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Subarticle B. Out-of-State Trust Institution Trust Office.

§ 81-27-2.101.
Trust business at a branch or trust office.

An out-of-state trust institution may act as a fiduciary in this state or engage in a trust business at an office in this state only if it maintains (i) a trust office in this state as permitted by this subarticle or (ii) a branch in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-2.102.
Establishing an interstate trust office.

An out-of-state trust institution that does not operate a trust office in this state and that meets the requirements of this subarticle may establish and maintain a new trust office in this state.

Until January 1, 1999, an out-of-state trust institution may not establish a new trust office in this state unless a similar institution chartered under the laws of this state to act as a fiduciary, is permitted to establish a new trust office that may engage in activities substantially similar to those permitted to trust offices of out-of-state trust institutions under Section 81-27-2.101, in the state where such out-of-state trust institution has its principal office.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-2.103.
Acquiring an interstate trust office.

An out-of-state trust institution that does not operate a trust office in this state and that meets the requirements of this subarticle may acquire and maintain a trust office in this state.

Until January 1, 1999, no out-of-state trust institution may maintain a trust office in this state unless a similar institution chartered under the laws of this state to act as a fiduciary is permitted to acquire and maintain a trust office through an acquisition of a trust office in the state where such out-of-state trust institution has its principal office and may engage in activities substantially similar to those permitted to trust offices of out-of-state trust institutions under Section 81-27-2.101, in the state where such out-of-state trust institution has its principal office.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-2.104.
Requirement of notice.

An out-of-state trust institution desiring to establish and maintain a new trust office or acquire and maintain a trust office in this state pursuant to this subarticle shall provide, or cause its home state regulator to provide, written notice of the proposed transaction to the commissioner on or after the date on which the out-of-state trust institution applies to the home state regulator for approval to establish and maintain or acquire the trust office. The filing of such notice shall be preceded or accompanied by a copy of the resolution adopted by the board authorizing the additional office and the filing fee, if any, prescribed by the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-2.105.
Conditions for approval.

No trust office of an out-of-state trust institution may be acquired or established in this state under this subarticle unless:

The out-of-state trust institution shall have confirmed in writing to the commissioner that for as long as it maintains a trust office in this state, it will comply with all applicable laws of this state.

The notificant shall have provided satisfactory evidence to the commissioner of compliance with (i) any applicable requirements of Sections 79-4-15.01 through 79-4-15.10 and (ii) the applicable requirements of its home state regulator for acquiring or establishing and maintaining such office.

The commissioner, acting within sixty (60) days after receiving notice under Section 81-27-2.104, shall have certified to the home state regulator that the requirements of this subarticle have been met and the notice has been approved or, if applicable, that any conditions imposed by the commissioner pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection have been satisfied.

The out-of-state trust institution may commence business at the trust office on the sixty-first day after the date the commissioner receives the notice unless the commissioner specifies an earlier or later date, provided, with respect to an out-of-state trust institution that is not a depository institution and for which the commissioner shall have conditioned such approval on the satisfaction by the notificant of any requirement applicable to a state trust company pursuant to Section 81-27-4.104(a) or 81-27-4.106, such institution shall have satisfied such conditions and provided to the commissioner satisfactory evidence thereof.

The sixty-day period of review may be extended by the commissioner on a determination that the written notice raises issues that require additional information or additional time for analysis. If the period of review is extended, the out-of-state trust institution may establish the office only on prior written approval by the commissioner.

The commissioner may deny approval of the office if the commissioner finds that the notificant lacks sufficient financial resources to undertake the proposed expansion without adversely affecting its safety or soundness or that the proposed office is contrary to the public interest. In acting on the notice, the commissioner shall consider the views of the appropriate bank supervisory agencies.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-2.106.
Additional trust offices.

An out-of-state trust institution that maintains a trust office in this state under this subarticle may establish or acquire additional trust offices or representative trust offices in this state to the same extent that a state trust institution may establish or acquire additional offices in this state pursuant to the procedures for establishing or acquiring such offices set forth in Section 81-27-2.004.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.